Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 73-201 to 73-204:

(1) Contingent fee means any fee, whether commission, percentage, brokerage, finder's fee, or contingent fee or otherwise denominated, which is a percentage or portion of the amount or value recovered, obtained, or involved;

(2) Contingent fee contract means any contract or agreement which provides for payment of a contingent fee; and

(3) State means any department or agency of the state other than (a) the University of Nebraska, (b) the Nebraska state colleges, and (c) any other board, commission, or agency established by the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 4.